District of Columbia statutes.
44-707

Stipends for patients and certain resident employees.

The Mayor of the District of Columbia is authorized, pursuant to regulations prescribed by the Council of the District of Columbia, to provide for the payment of stipends to patients and residents employed in institutions of or under programs sponsored by the government of the District of Columbia as an aid to their rehabilitation or for training purposes. Nothing contained herein shall be construed as conferring employee status on any person covered by this section.

Oct. 26, 1973, 87 Stat. 505, Pub. L. 93-140, § 6
1981 Ed., § 32-126.
1973 Ed., § 32-333.
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to the District of Columbia Council and to a Commissioner of the District of Columbia. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.